src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2025 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no



!! # South Saami pronouns
!     ====================
!     ====================
!     ====================





LEXICON Pronoun
!! The **@LEXNAME@** lexicon points to all the subgrops, presented in this order below:

Reciprocal ;    !!= * @CODE@
Personal ;	    !!= * @CODE@
Demonstrative ; !!= * @CODE@
Interrogative ; !!= * @CODE@
Indefinite ;    !!= * @CODE@
Reflexive ;	    !!= * @CODE@





!! ## The Reciprocal pronoun
!    ----------------------
!    ----------------------
!    ----------------------


LEXICON Reciprocal
sinsitniem+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Acc:sinsitniem FINAL1 ;          !!= * @CODE@
sinsitniem+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:sinsitnem FINAL1 ;   !! * ...
sinsitniem+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Gen:sinsitnien FINAL1 ;
sinsitniem+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ill:sinsætnan FINAL1 ;
sinsitniem+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Ela:sinsitneste FINAL1 ;
sinsitniem+Pron+Recipr+Sg+Com:sinsitnine FINAL1 ;

sinsitniem+Pron+Recipr+Pl+Acc:sinsitnide FINAL1 ; ! Not in MMM


!! ## Personal pronouns
!    -----------------
!    -----------------
!    -----------------


!! Splitting in 1st, 2nd, 3rd
!  - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON Personal

!! New lemma form, now number as baseform, due to Oahpa

manne+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Gen:mov # ; ! Added to fill the gap, remove this or previous
manne+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Gen+Err/Orth:muv # ;
manne+Pron+Pers+Sg1:m firstperspronsg ;
månnoeh+Pron+Pers+Du1:m firstpersprondu ;
mijjieh+Pron+Pers+Pl1:m perspronpl ;
datne+Pron+Pers+Sg2:d nonfirstperspronsg ;
dåtnoeh+Pron+Pers+Du2:d nonfirstpersprondu ;
dijjieh+Pron+Pers+Pl2:d perspronpl ;
satne+Pron+Logo+Sg3:s nonfirstperspronsg ;
såtnoeh+Pron+Logo+Du3:s nonfirstpersprondu ;
sijjieh+Pron+Logo+Pl3:s perspronpl ;
DIHTE ; ! this is for personal pronoun use of dïhte


!! ### Lexica for sg
!   - - - - - - -

LEXICON firstperspronsg
!! the **@LEXNAME@** for first pers has special consonantism
:anne longproncase ;
+Ill:unnjien FINAL1 ;
+Ill+Use/NG:unnjan FINAL1 ;

LEXICON nonfirstperspronsg
!! for **@LEXNAME@** the 2nd and 3rd are identical
:atne longproncase ;
+Gen:ov FINAL1 ;
+Gen+Err/Orth:uv FINAL1 ;
+Ill:utnjien FINAL1 ;
+Ill+Use/NG:utnjan FINAL1 ;


!! ### Lexica for du
!   - - - - - - -

LEXICON firstpersprondu  !!= * @CODE@
+Nom:ånnoeh FINAL1 ;
+Nom+Err/Orth:onnoeh firstpersprondu ;
+Gen:onnen FINAL1 ;
+Gen+Err/Orth:onnoej FINAL1 ;
+Ill:onnese FINAL1 ;
+Nom+Use/NG:onne FINAL1 ;
+Acc:onnem FINAL1 ;
+Ine:onnesne FINAL1 ;
+Ela:onneste FINAL1 ;
+Com:onnine FINAL1 ;

LEXICON nonfirstpersprondu  !!= * @CODE@
+Nom:åtnoeh FINAL1 ;
+Nom+Err/Orth:otnoeh FINAL1 ;
+Gen+Err/Orth:otnoej FINAL1 ;
+Gen:otnen FINAL1 ;
+Ill:otnese FINAL1 ;
+Nom+Use/NG:otne FINAL1 ;
+Acc:otnem FINAL1 ;
+Ine:otnesne FINAL1 ;
+Ela:otneste FINAL1 ;
+Com:otnine FINAL1 ;

!  sotnoeh+Pron+Logo+Du3+Err/Orth:s nonfirstpersprondu ;

!! ### Lexica for pl
! - - - - - - -

LEXICON perspronpl  !!= * @CODE@
+Nom:ijjieh FINAL1 ;
+Nom+Use/NG:ijje FINAL1 ;
+Nom+Err/Orth:iejjieh FINAL1 ;
+Nom+Err/Orth:ijieh FINAL1 ;
+Acc:ijjem FINAL1 ;
+Acc+Use/NG:ijjiem FINAL1 ;
+Gen:ijjen FINAL1 ;
+Gen+Use/NG:ijjien FINAL1 ;
+Ill:ijjese FINAL1 ;
+Ill+Err/Orth:ijjiese FINAL1 ;
+Ill+Use/NG:ijjide FINAL1 ;
+Ine:ijjesne FINAL1 ;
+Ela:ijjeste FINAL1 ;
+Ela+Use/NG:ijjijste FINAL1 ;
+Com:ijjeX2ine FINAL1 ;


!! ### Common case lexica
! - - - - - - - - -


LEXICON longproncase  !!= * @CODE@
+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+Acc:m FINAL1 ;
+Ine:sne FINAL1 ;
+Ela:ste FINAL1 ;
+Com:X2ine FINAL1 ;


!! ### dïhte
LEXICON DIHTE
!! **@LEXNAME@**  is a personal pronoun,
!! demonstrative dïhte is treated below.
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom:dïhte FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc:dam FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc+Use/NG:altemse FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen:dan FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen+Use/NG:altese FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen+Use/NG:elties FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen+Use/NG:eltie FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ill:dïsse FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ill+PxSg3:altasasse FINAL1 ; !dïhte


dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ine:desnie FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ela:destie FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ela+Use/NG:altasistie FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Com:dejnie FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Com+Use/NG:altasinie FINAL1 ;

dah% guaktah+Pron+Pers+Du3+Nom:dah% guaktah FINAL1 ; ! For oahpa use

dah+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom:dah FINAL1 ;
dah+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc:dejtie FINAL1 ;
dah+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen+Use/NG:daj FINAL1 ;
dah+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen:dej FINAL1 ;
dah+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen+Use/NG:altese FINAL1 ;
dah+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ill:dejtie FINAL1 ;
dïhte+Pron+Refl+Sg+Ill+PxPl3:altasissie FINAL1 ; !dïhte
dah+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ine:dejnie FINAL1 ;
dah+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ela:dejstie FINAL1 ;
dah+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Com:dejgujmie FINAL1 ;
dah+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Com+Use/NG:dajgujmie FINAL1 ;

dah% guaktah+Pron+Pers+Du3+Gen:altesigan FINAL1 ; ! XXX check this




!! ## Demonstrative pronouns
!    ----------------------
!    ----------------------
!    ----------------------

!! This is for:
!! the attributive forms of dïhte
!! all forms of the other pronouns

!! ### The initial demonstrative lexica
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON DAGKERES    !!= * @CODE@
+Attr:eres # ; ! Sjekk dette paradigmet, det er bygd på m-
+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:eres FINAL1 ; ! Sub?
+Sg+Nom:ere FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Acc:erem FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Gen:eren FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ill:arasse FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ine+Attr:arinie FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Ine:arisnie FINAL1 ; ! sjekk ??? Ine arisnie
+Sg+Ela:aristie FINAL1 ;
+Sg+Com:arinie FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Nom:erh FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Acc:aridie FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Gen:eri FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ill:aridie FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ela:arijstie FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ine:arijnie FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Com:erigujmie FINAL1 ;






!! ## Interrogative and relative pronouns
!    -----------------------------------
!    -----------------------------------
!    -----------------------------------

LEXICON Demonstrative   !!= * @CODE@
magkeres+Pron+Interr:magk DAGKERES ;
gukteres+Pron+Interr:gukt DAGKERES ; ! XXX guktemes eller gukteres? Eg retta til gukteres basert på orda omkring
dagkeres+Pron+Dem:dagk DAGKERES ;
daagkeres+Pron+Dem:daagk DAGKERES ;
doegkeres+Pron+Dem:doegk DAGKERES ;
dogkeres+Pron+Dem:dogk DAGKERES ;
